Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB571.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 176 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural land" means:
1. Any tract of land, including all income-producing improvements, of at least ten (10)
contiguous acres in area used for the production of livestock, livestock products, poultry,
poultry products or the growing of tobacco or other crops including timber; or
2. Any tract of land devoted to and meeting the requirements and qualifications for payments
pursuant to agriculture programs under an agreement with the state or federal government;
(b) "Fully shielded" means an outdoor light fixture that is shaded so that light rays emitted by the
fixture, either directly from the lamp or indirectly from the fixture, are no longer encroaching on
agricultural land; and
(c) "Outdoor light fixture" means any light fixture owned or maintained by the cabinet.
(2) The cabinet shall not allow light emitted from an outdoor light fixture to encroach on any agricultural land,
whether public or private.
(3) Any new outdoor light fixture installed after the effective date of this Act which emits light that encroaches
on agricultural land shall be fully shielded at the time of installation.
(4) If light emitted from an outdoor light fixture encroaches on agricultural land, the owner of that land may
submit a complaint in writing to the cabinet, and the cabinet shall ensure that the outdoor light fixture is
fully shielded within thirty (30) days of the date of the submission of the written complaint.
(5) This section shall not apply to outdoor light fixtures used by the cabinet or its contractors incidental to a
highway construction or maintenance project, provided the encroachment lasts for no longer than one
hundred eighty (180) days and that the lights are turned off when not in active use for construction or
safety purposes.
Section 2. Whereas it is critical to protect agricultural land from damage caused by light pollution and to
protect farmers of the Commonwealth from any losses in crop yields resulting from light pollution as soon as
possible, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor
or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version